North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-16 Eradication of Gophers, Rabbits, and Crows [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 439, § 104]

4-16-01.
Gophers defined. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 174, § 5; C. L. 1913, § 2873; R.C. 1943, § 4-1601; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

4-16-02.
Gopher, rabbit, and crow destruction fund — Levy — Expending. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 144, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1895, §§ 1344, 1345; R.C. 1899, § 1322; S.L. 1901, ch. 107, § 1; 1905, ch. 114, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 1636; C.L. 1913, § 2261; S.L. 1915, ch. 106, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2261; R.C. 1943, § 4-1602; S.L. 1983, ch. 593, § 5; 1983, ch. 606, § 10; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

4-16-03.
Bounty offered upon petition. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 114, § 2; R.C. 1905, § 1637; C.L. 1913, § 2262; S.L. 1915, ch. 106, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 2262; S.L. 1927, ch. 154, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 4-1603; S.L. 1985, ch. 235, § 8; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

4-16-04.
Township may appoint person to exterminate gophers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 174, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2869; R.C. 1943, § 4-1604; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

4-16-05.
Notice to exterminate gophers — How given — Failure to exterminate. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 174, § 2; C.L. 1913, § 2870; R.C. 1943, § 4-1605; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

4-16-06.
Person exterminating gophers — Precautions required in laying poison. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 174, § 2; C.L. 1913, § 2870; R.C. 1943, § 4-1606; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

4-16-07.
Compensation for exterminating gophers — Sworn statement required. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 174, § 3; C.L. 1913, § 2871; R.C. 1943, § 4-1607; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

4-16-08.
Charges for gopher extermination. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 174, § 3; C.L. 1913, § 2871; R.C. 1943, § 4-1608; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

4-16-09.
Charges entered as taxes — Notice required — Appearance — Appeal to district court — Collection. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 174, § 3; C.L. 1913, § 2871; R.C. 1943, § 4-1609; S.L. 1981, ch. 320, § 1; 1989, ch. 83, § 2; repealed by 2015, sb2144, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

4-16-10.
Extermination of gophers in unorganized townships. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 174, § 4; C.L. 1913, § 2872; R.C. 1943, § 4-1610; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.